District of Columbia statutes.
50-2206.32

Penalties for operating watercraft under the influence of alcohol or a drug.

(a)

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, a person violating any provision of § 50-2206.31 shall upon conviction for the first offense be fined $1,000, or incarcerated for not more than 180 days, or both.

(b)

A person violating any provisions of § 50-2206.31 when the person has a prior offense under § 50-2206.31 or § 50-2206.33 and is being sentenced on the current offense shall be fined not less than $2,500 and not more than $5,000, or incarcerated for not more than one year, or both.

(c)

A person violating any one or more provisions of § 50-2206.31 when the person has 2 or more prior offenses under § 50-2206.31 or § 50-2206.33 and is being sentenced on the current offense shall be fined not less than $2,500 and not more than $10,000, or incarcerated for not more than one year, or both.

(d)

The fines set forth in this section shall not be limited by § 22-3571.01.

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 3k
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 103(e)(3), 59 DCR 12957
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 113(f)(4), 59 DCR 12957

History

This section is referenced in § 50-1911.

Section References

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 added this section.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added (d).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 113(f)(4) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).

Emergency Legislation

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.

Editor's Notes